test/src/gt-norm-yamls/izh-test-N-lehti_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lehti: # Noun 'leaf'
     lehti+N+Sg+Nom: lehti
     lehti+N+Sg+Gen: lehen
     lehti+N+Sg+Acc: lehen
     lehti+N+Sg+Par: lehteä
     lehti+N+Sg+Ill: lehtee
     lehti+N+Sg+Ine: lehes
     lehti+N+Sg+Ela: lehest
     lehti+N+Sg+All: lehelle
     lehti+N+Sg+Ade: lehel
     lehti+N+Sg+Abl: lehelt
     lehti+N+Sg+Tra: leheks
     lehti+N+Sg+Ess: lehtennä
     lehti+N+Sg+Exe: lehtent

     lehti+N+Pl+Nom: lehet
     lehti+N+Pl+Gen: [lehtilöin, lehtiin]
     lehti+N+Pl+Acc: lehet
     lehti+N+Pl+Par: lehtilöjä
     lehti+N+Pl+Ill: lehtilöihe
     lehti+N+Pl+Ine: lehtilöis
     lehti+N+Pl+Ela: lehtilöist
     lehti+N+Pl+All: lehtilöille
     lehti+N+Pl+Ade: lehtilöil
     lehti+N+Pl+Abl: lehtilöilt
     lehti+N+Pl+Tra: lehtilöiks
     lehti+N+Pl+Ess: lehtilöinnä
     lehti+N+Pl+Exe: lehtilöint
